Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 8. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 42.05.631.
Eminent domain.

A public utility may exercise the power of eminent domain for public utility uses. This section does not authorize the use of a declaration of taking.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970)

Cross references. —

For laws on eminent domain, see AS

09.55.240

—

09.55.460

. For court rules applicable to eminent domain, see Alaska Rule of Civil Procedure 72.

Sec. 42.05.640.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.641.
Regulation by municipality.

The commission’s jurisdiction and authority extend to public utilities operating within a municipality, whether home rule or otherwise.
In the event of a conflict between a certificate, order, decision, or regulation of the commission and a charter, permit, franchise, ordinance, rule, or regulation of such a local governmental entity, the certificate, order, decision, or regulation of the commission shall prevail.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970; am § 18 ch 168 SLA 1990)

Sec. 42.05.645.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.650.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.651.
Expenses of investigation or hearing.

During a hearing or investigation held under this chapter, the commission may allocate the costs of the hearing or investigation among the parties, including the commission, as is just under the circumstances. In allocating costs, the commission shall consider the regulatory cost charge paid by a utility under AS

42.05.254

and may consider the results, ability to pay, evidence of good faith, other relevant factors, and mitigating circumstances. Notwithstanding an intervening party’s ability to pay, if the commission determines that an intervening party has conducted its intervention in a frivolous manner, the commission shall allocate all costs associated with the intervention to that party. The costs allocated may include the costs of any time devoted to the investigation or hearing by hired consultants, whether or not the consultants appear as witnesses or participants. The costs allocated may also include any out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the commission in the particular proceeding. The commission shall provide an opportunity for any person objecting to an allocation to be heard before the allocation becomes final.

[Repealed, § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991.]

Notwithstanding the commission’s discretion under (a) of this section to allocate costs to parties, the commission may not require a state agency to pay any costs allocated to the state agency.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970; am § 63 ch 138 SLA 1986; am § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991; am §§ 21, 22 ch 2 FSSLA 1992; am § 3 ch 1 SLA 1995; am § 6 ch 98 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The word “party” in this section and in AS

42.06.610

, for purposes of allocating the commission’s costs of rulemaking proceedings, should be interpreted in its ordinary legal sense and does not include interested persons who comment in a rulemaking proceeding.
It follows that the commission cannot, in order to allocate costs to a person, make that person a party to a rulemaking proceeding, whether by declaration or by invitation to which the person responds. September 29, 1986, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 42.05.661.
Application fees.

With each application relating to a certificate the applicant shall pay the commission a fee set by the commission by regulation that shall be deposited in the general fund of the state.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970; am § 23 ch 2 FSSLA 1992)

Administrative Code. —

For criteria for intrastate interexchange telephone competition, see 3 AAC 52, art. 4.

Sec. 42.05.671.
Public records.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, records in the possession of the commission are open to public inspection at reasonable times.

The commission may, by regulation, classify the records submitted to it by regulated utilities as privileged records that are not open to the public for inspection. However, if a record involves an application or tariff filing pending before the commission, the commission shall release the record for the purpose of preparing for or making a presentation to the commission in the proceeding if the record or information derived from the record will be used by the commission in the proceeding.

A person may make written objection to the public disclosure of information contained in a record under the provisions of this chapter or of information obtained by the commission or by the attorney general under the provisions of this chapter, stating the grounds for the objection. When an objection is made, the commission may not order the information withheld from public disclosure unless the information adversely affects the interest of the person making written objection and disclosure is not required in the interest of the public.

In this section, “record” means a report, file, book, account, paper, or application, and the facts and information contained in it.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970; am § 8 ch 110 SLA 1981; am § 7 ch 98 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

Sec. 42.05.681.
Validity of certain certificates.

A certificate issued before July 29, 1968, to a public utility for the generation, transmission, or distribution of electric energy and power, or for the furnishing of telecommunications may not be considered as terminated or voided for the sole reason that the utility did not or would not produce an annual gross income in excess of $25,000.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970)

Sec. 42.05.691.
Utility classes.

The commission may by regulation provide for the classification of public utilities based upon differences in annual revenue, assets, nature of ownership, and other appropriate distinctions and as between these classifications, by regulation, provide for different reporting, accounting, and other regulatory requirements.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970)

Administrative Code. —

For utility and pipeline tariffs, see 3 AAC 48, art. 2.

For cost-of-service study and rate design information for electric utilities, see 3 AAC 48, art. 3.

For gas utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 1.

For electric utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 5.

For water and wastewater utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 8.

Sec. 42.05.701.
[Renumbered as AS 42.05.720.]

Sec. 42.05.711.
Exemptions.

The provisions of this chapter do not apply to a person who furnishes water, gas or petroleum or petroleum products by tank, wagon, or similar conveyance, unless the person is thereby supplying water, gas, petroleum or petroleum products to a public utility in which the person has an “affiliated interest”.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection and in (o) of this section, public utilities owned and operated by a political subdivision of the state, or electric operating entities established as the instrumentality of two or more public utilities owned and operated by political subdivisions of the state, are exempt from this chapter, other than AS

42.05.221

—

42.05.281

and

42.05.385

. However,

the governing body of a political subdivision may elect to be subject to this chapter; and

a utility or electric operating entity that is owned and operated by a political subdivision and that directly competes with another utility or electric operating entity is subject to this chapter and any other utility or electric operating entity owned and operated by the political subdivision is also subject to this chapter; this paragraph does not apply to a utility or electric operating entity owned and operated by a political subdivision that competes with a telecommunications utility.

The ownership in whole or part of the corporate stock of a public utility does not make the owner a public utility.

The commission may exempt a utility, a class of utilities, or a utility service from all or a portion of this chapter if the commission finds that the exemption is in the public interest.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, any electric or telephone utility that does not gross $50,000 annually is exempt from regulation under this chapter unless the subscribers petition the commission for regulation under AS

42.05.712(h)

.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, an electric or telephone utility that does not gross $500,000 annually may elect to be exempt from the provisions of this chapter other than AS

42.05.221

—

42.05.281

under the procedure described in AS

42.05.712

.

A utility, other than a telephone or electric utility, that does not gross $150,000 annually may elect to be exempt from the provisions of this chapter other than AS

42.05.221

—

42.05.281

under the procedure described in AS

42.05.712

.

A cooperative organized under AS 10.25 may elect to be exempt from the provisions of this chapter, other than AS

42.05.221

—

42.05.281

, under the procedure described in AS

42.05.712

.

A utility that furnishes collection and disposal service of garbage, refuse, trash, or other waste material and has annual gross revenues of $300,000 or less is exempt from the provisions of this chapter, other than the certification provisions of AS

42.05.221

—

42.05.281

, unless the subscribers petition the commission for regulation under AS

42.05.712(h)

. Notwithstanding AS

42.05.712(b)

and (g), if subscribers representing 25 percent of the gross revenue of the utility petition the commission for regulation, the utility is subject to the provisions of this chapter.

The provisions of this chapter do not apply to sales, exchanges, or gifts of energy to an electric utility certificated under this chapter when the energy which is the subject of the sale, exchange, or gift is waste heat, electricity, or other energy which is surplus or the by-product of an industrial process. In an area in which no electric utility is certificated for service, energy provided by sale, exchange, or gift may be provided to any utility which is certificated for service to that area. A contract for the sale, exchange, or gift of energy exempt under this subsection does not make the supplier a public utility and does not transfer the responsibility to provide utility services from a certificated utility to any other person.

A utility that furnishes cable television service is exempt from the provisions of this chapter other than AS

42.05.221

—

42.05.281

unless the subscribers petition the commission for regulation under the procedure described in AS

42.05.712

.

A person, utility, joint action agency established under AS

42.45.310

, or cooperative that is exempt from regulation under (a), (d) — (k), (o), or (r) of this section is not subject to regulation by a municipality under AS

29.35.060

and

29.35.070

.

The collection and disposal, under AS

29.35.050(c)

, by a municipality of waste material deposited at an intermediate transfer site is exempt from this chapter.

Except as provided by AS

42.06.370(c)

, the provisions of this chapter do not apply to a person who owns or operates a natural gas pipeline as a North Slope natural gas pipeline carrier, as that term is defined in AS

42.06.630

.

A joint action agency established under AS

42.45.310

is exempt from regulation under this chapter, including the requirement to obtain a certificate of public convenience and necessity under AS

42.05.221

, for the operation of, sale of power from, and other activities related to the power project the joint action agency purchases from the Alaska Energy Authority until the wholesale agreement and any related contract assigned by the authority becomes subject to review or approval by the commission under AS

42.05.431

. The exemption provided by this subsection extends to repairs and improvements to the power project the joint action agency purchases from the authority but does not extend to any other power project or other activity of the joint action agency.

A regional solid waste management authority established under AS

29.35.800

—

29.35.925

is exempt from regulation under this chapter, except that a solid waste management authority is subject to this chapter if it directly competes with a utility subject to this chapter.

The service of natural gas storage furnished by operating a natural gas storage facility that is (1) part of a pipeline facility operated by a pipeline carrier, (2) part of a natural gas pipeline facility operated by a natural gas pipeline carrier, or (3) part of a North Slope natural gas pipeline facility operated by a North Slope natural gas pipeline carrier is exempt from this chapter. In this subsection, “natural gas pipeline carrier,” “natural gas pipeline facility,” “North Slope natural gas pipeline carrier,” “North Slope natural gas pipeline facility,” “pipeline carrier,” and “pipeline facility” have the meanings given in AS

42.06.630

.

A plant or facility that generates electricity entirely from renewable energy resources is exempt from regulation under this chapter, other than applicable regulation under AS

42.05.760

—

42.05.790

, if

the plant or facility

is first placed into commercial operation on or after August 31, 2010, and before July 1, 2028; and

does not generate more than 65 megawatts of electricity;

the electricity generated by the plant or facility is sold only to one or more electric utilities that are regulated by the commission; and

the person that constructs, owns, acquires, or operates the plant or facility has not received from the state

a grant that was used to generate the electricity from the renewable energy resources; or

a tax credit related to the generation of electricity from the renewable energy resources.

An in-state natural gas pipeline subject to AS 42.08 and an in-state natural gas pipeline carrier subject to AS 42.08 are exempt from this chapter.

In this section, “renewable energy resources” means

wind, solar, geothermal, wasteheat recovery, hydrothermal, wave, tidal, river in-stream, or hydropower;

low-emission nontoxic biomass based on solid or liquid organic fuels from wood, forest and field residues, or animal or fish products;

dedicated energy crops available on a renewable basis; or

landfill gas and digester gas.

A utility that provides telecommunications services is exempt from the provisions of this chapter, other than AS

42.05.141(e)

and (f),

42.05.221

—

42.05.281

,

42.05.296

,

42.05.306

,

42.05.381(l)

— (n),

42.05.631

,

42.05.641

,

42.05.661

, and

42.05.820

—

42.05.860

.

Notwithstanding (u) of this section, the commission has the authority to regulate the rates and terms and conditions of telecommunications services provided to inmates in the custody of the Department of Corrections.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970; am § 3 ch 76 SLA 1973; am § 8 ch 83 SLA 1980; am §§ 7 — 9 ch 136 SLA 1980; am § 89 ch 59 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 30 SLA 1983; am § 68 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 80 SLA 1985; am § 2 ch 107 SLA 1986; am § 5 ch 93 SLA 1990; am § 3 ch 176 SLA 1990; am §§ 4 — 8 ch 1 SLA 1995; am § 2 ch 56 SLA 2000; am §§ 2 — 4 ch 4 SLA 2001; am § 1 ch 74 SLA 2002; am § 3 ch 26 SLA 2006; am § 8 ch 16 SLA 2010; am §§ 2, 3 ch 37 SLA 2010; am §§ 5, 6 ch 6 SLA 2012; am § 19 ch 11 SLA 2013; am § 1 ch 45 SLA 2016; am § 10 ch 24 SLA 2019; am § 1 ch 13 SLA 2021)

Revisor's notes. —

Subsection (r) was enacted as (q); relettered in 2010, at which time a conforming amendment was made in (

l

) of this section.

Subsection (s) was enacted as (t); relettered in 2018 to conform to the style of the Alaska Statutes, at which time subsection (s) was relettered as (t).

Cross references. —

For limitations on these exemptions, see AS

42.05.254

, AS

42.05.321(b)

, and AS

42.05.381(c)

.

Administrative Code. —

For applicability, see 3 AAC 47, art. 1.

For regulatory policy standards, see 3 AAC 50, art. 1.

For cogeneration and small power production, see 3 AAC 50, art. 2.

For criteria for the provision of telecommunications relay service for the deaf, hard of hearing, and speech impaired, see 3 AAC 51, art. 1.

For gas utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 1.

For criteria for intrastate interexchange telephone competition, see 3 AAC 52, art. 4.

For electric utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 5.

For adjustment clause, see 3 AAC 52, art. 6.

For water and wastewater utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 8.

For procedures for changing an authorized telecommunications carrier, see 3 AAC 53, art. 3.

For local exchange competition, see 3 AAC 53, art. 4.

For universal service fund, see 3 AAC 53, art. 5.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective October 18, 2016, in (r)(1)(A), substituted “July 1, 2021” for “January 1, 2016”.

The 2019 amendment, effective November 27, 2019, added (u) and (v).

The 2021 amendment, effective July 1, 2021, in (r), in the introductory language, inserted “, other than applicable regulation under AS

42.05.760

–

42.05.790

,” near the end, in (r)(1)(A), substituted “July 1, 2028” for “July 1, 2021” near the end.

Opinions of attorney general. —

An electrical utility owned and operated by a regional electrical authority would continue to qualify for the broad exemption from this chapter, available to political subdivisions under subsection (b) of this section once the regional electrical authority had completed its proposed organization as a nonprofit corporation under AS 10.20. June 7, 1976, Op. Att’y Gen.

When a deregulated utility exceeds the gross annual limit of $325,000 [increased in 1995 to $500,000] specified in subsection (f), and thus fails to be eligible for deregulation, the deregulation exemption ends automatically, and the utility is again subject to economic regulation. December 20, 1988, Op. Att’y Gen.

In order for the commission to effectively provide for an overview of eligibility for statutory exemption from regulation, it should specify the nature and extent of the exemption certified and require the subject utility to submit a report on its annual operating revenues.
These terms and conditions should be included in the order which certifies the deregulation election results.
December 20, 1988, Op. Att’y Gen.

Subsection (r) provides for an exemption from regulation of certain public utilities by the Regulatory Commission of Alaska. It is ambiguous, in that it uses the terms "plant or facility'' and "placed into commercial operation'', but does not define those terms, and it does not make it clear whether or not the entire plant or facility is required to be placed into operation. The better interpretation is that the exemption is applicable to an expansion of a plant or facility that qualified for the exemption, even if it is later expanded, so long as the facility produces less than 65 megawatts of electricity. April 6, 2016 Op. Att'y Gen.

Sec. 42.05.712.
Deregulation ballot.

A utility or cooperative that may elect to be exempt from the provisions of this chapter shall poll its subscribers or members in the manner described in this section.

The votes of a majority of those voting in an election in which at least 15 percent of the eligible subscribers or members return ballots are required for a utility or cooperative to elect exemption under (a) of this section.

Each subscriber or member of the utility or cooperative shall receive notice of an election under this section with the subscriber’s or member’s regular bill for service at least 60 days before the date set for the election. The notice shall contain impartial language informing the subscribers or members that an election on the option of deregulation or regulation by the Regulatory Commission of Alaska will be held within 60 days and that a ballot to participate in that election will be mailed or delivered to each subscriber or member of the utility or cooperative with the regular bill for service. The notice shall also state that a subscriber or member of the cooperative is entitled to vote in the election without regard to whether the subscriber’s or member’s account with the utility or cooperative is current and that the ballot must be postmarked or returned to the commission within 30 days after it was mailed or otherwise delivered to the subscriber or member. The notice shall also announce the schedule for one or more public meetings which shall provide an opportunity for the subscribers or members to discuss this election. The public meeting or meetings shall be held not more than 30 days before the ballots are mailed or distributed to those eligible to vote. A cooperative may satisfy this requirement by including a discussion of this election on the agenda of an annual meeting if the annual meeting is scheduled to be held not more than 30 days before the election.

A ballot with return postage paid shall be mailed or delivered to each subscriber or member of the utility or cooperative with the subscriber’s or member’s bill for service and shall contain only the following language:

The results of an election under this section shall be certified by the commission within 60 days after the ballots are mailed or delivered to the subscribers or members.

During the 60 days immediately preceding an election under this section a list of subscribers or members of the utility or cooperative shall be made available at cost to any subscriber or member of the utility or cooperative who requests one. The list shall be in the same form that is available to the utility or cooperative.

The board of directors of a utility or cooperative may call an election under this section on its own initiative and shall call an election upon receipt of a valid petition from its subscribers or members. A petition shall be considered valid if it is signed by not less than the number of subscribers or members equal to ten percent of the first 5,000 subscribers or members and three percent of the subscribers or members in excess of 5,000. An election under this section may only be held once every two years.

A utility or cooperative that is already exempt from regulation under this section or that is exempt from regulation under AS

42.05.711(e)

, (i), or (k) may elect to terminate its exemption in the same manner.

“Shall.(name of utility or cooperative) be exempt from regulation by the Regulatory Commission of Alaska? [
] YES [
] NO”

Click to view

History.

(§ 10 ch 136 SLA 1980; am § 9 ch 1 SLA 1995)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in subsections (c) and (d) “Regulatory Commission of Alaska” was substituted for “Alaska Public Utilities Commission” in accordance with § 30(a), ch. 25, SLA 1999.

Administrative Code. —

For deregulation ballot: election procedure, see 3 AAC 49, art. 1.

For water and wastewater utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 8.

Sec. 42.05.720.
[Renumbered as AS 42.05.990.]

Sec. 42.05.721.
[Renumbered as AS 42.05.995.]